Missouri, session 2026, HB3354.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 209.130, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 209.130, to read as follows:
209.130. There is hereby levied an annual tax of [three cents] 2.75 cents on each one
hundred dollars valuation of taxable property in the state of Missouri to provide a fund out of
which shall be paid the pensions for the deserving blind as herein provided. The tax shall be
collected at the same time and in the same manner and by the same means as other state taxes
are now collected. The tax, when so collected, shall be paid into the state treasury to the
credit of the blind pension fund, out of which fund shall be paid the pension as provided by
law. Any balance remaining in the fund after the payment of the pensions may be
appropriated for the adequate support of the commission for the blind, and any balance
remaining at the end of the biennium shall be transferred to the distributive public school
fund.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.